District of Columbia statutes.
2-1597

Administrative support.

The Commission may hire staff and obtain equipment, supplies, materials, and services necessary to carry out the functions of the Commission.

History

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 507, 54 DCR 4102